Utah statutes.
11-32-2.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Assignment agreement" means the agreement, security agreement, indenture, or other documentation by which the county transfers the delinquent tax receivables to the authority in consideration of the amounts paid by the authority under the assignment agreement, as provided in this chapter.

(2)  "Bonds" means any bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness of the financing authority issued under this chapter.

(3)  "Delinquent tax receivables" means those ad valorem tangible property taxes levied within any county, for any year, which remain unpaid and owing the participant members within the county, as of January 15 of the following year, plus any interest and penalties accruing or assessed to them.

(4)  "Financing authority" or "authority" means a nonprofit corporation organized under this chapter by a county on behalf of the participant members within the county as the financing authority for the participant members solely for the purpose of financing the assignment of the delinquent tax receivables of the participant members for which it was created.

(5)  "Governing body" means the council, commission, county legislative body, board of education, board of trustees, or any other governing entity of a public body in which the legislative powers of the public body are vested.

(6)  "Participant members" means those public bodies, including the county, the governing bodies of which approve the creation of an authority as provided in Section 11-32-3 and on whose behalf the authority acts.

(7)  "Public body" means any city, town, county, school district, special service district, local district, community development and renewal agency, or any other entity entitled to receive ad valorem property taxes, existing under the laws of the state.

